Wisconsin, session 2025, SB276.
do enact as follows:SB276,1Section 1. 227.40 (4) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:227.40 (4) (a) In any proceeding pursuant to this section for judicial review of a rule or guidance document, the court shall declare the rule or guidance document invalid if it finds that it violates constitutional provisions or exceeds the statutory authority of the agency or was promulgated or adopted without compliance with statutory rule-making or adoption procedures and shall award the party asserting the invalidity of the rule or guidance document, notwithstanding s. 814.04 (1), reasonable attorney fees and costs. If the proceeding is a judicial proceeding specified in sub. (2), attorney fees and costs awarded under this paragraph shall be limited to those associated with the challenge to the validity of the rule or guidance document, as the court so determines.SB276,2Section 2. Initial applicability.(1) This act first applies to an action commenced on the effective date of this subsection. Down Down /2025/related/vetoedinfull/sb276 true vetoedenrolledbills /2025/related/vetoedinfull/sb276 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/SB276 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/SB276 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Vetoed in Full»SB276: Text as Enrolled × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting